Hawaii statutes.
§115-9 Obstructing access to public
property; penalty. (a) A person commits the offense of obstructing access
to public property if the person, by action or by having installed a physical
impediment, intentionally prevents a member of the public from traversing:

(1) A public right-of-way;

(2) A transit area;

(3) A public transit corridor; or

(4) A beach transit corridor;

and thereby obstructs access to and along the sea,
the shoreline, or any inland public recreational area.

(b) Physical impediments that may prevent
traversing include but are not limited to the following:

(1) Gates;

(2) Fences;

(3) Walls;

(4) Constructed barriers;

(5) Rubbish;

(6) Security guards;

(7) Guard dogs or animals; and

(8) A landowner's human-induced, enhanced, or unmaintained
vegetation that interferes or encroaches within beach transit corridors.

(c) Obstructing access to public property is a
misdemeanor.

(d) Minimum fines for violation under this
section shall be as follows:

(1) $1,000 for a second conviction; and

(2) $2,000 for any conviction after a second
conviction.

(e) As used in this section:

"Landowner" means the record owner of
the property or the record owner's agent, including a lessee, tenant, property
manager, or trustee.

"Person" means a natural person or a
legal entity.

"Public recreational area" means
public lands or bodies of water opened to the public for recreational use. [L
2004, c 169, §2; am L 2010, c 160, §4]

Note

Repeal and reenactment of section on June 30, 2013 by L 2010,
c 160, §7 deleted by L 2013, c 120, §4.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next